pt-PT: Tipo de calha de teto compatível: Tejadilho liso (encaixe na estrutura da porta); Calhas da caixa (carrinha de caixa aberta); Barras transversais de fábrica; Montagem em ponto fixo; Calhas laterais embutidas; Goteiras; Calhas laterais elevadas; Montagem em calha/canal; Outro
nb: Kompatibel takrelingstype: Bart tak (klipses på dørkarmen); Lastekarm (pickup); Fabrikkmonterte tverrstenger; Fastpunktmontering; Integrerte takrails; Takrenner; Hevede takrails; Spor-/kanalmontering; Annet
hu: Kompatibilis tetősíntípus: Csupasz tető (ajtókeretre rögzíthető); Platókorlát (pickup); Gyári kereszttartók; Fix pontos rögzítés; Integrált tetősínek; Esőcsatornák; Kiemelt tetősínek; Sínbe/csatornába rögzíthető; Egyéb
cs: Kompatibilní typ střešních ližin: Holá střecha (uchycení za rám dveří); Kolejnice na korbě (pickup); Tovární příčníky; Uchycení do pevných bodů; Integrované podélníky; Dešťové žlábky; Zvýšené podélníky; Uchycení do T-drážky; Jiné
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta strešnih sani: Gola streha (pritrditev na okvir vrat); Vodila na kesonu (poltovornjak); Tovarniške prečne letve; Pritrditev na fiksne točke; Integrirane stranske letve; Žlebovi za dež; Dvignjene stranske letve; Pritrditev na vodila/kanale; Drugo
fr: Type de barres de toit compatible: Toit nu (fixation sur cadre de porte); Barres de benne (pick-up); Barres transversales d’origine; Fixation sur points fixes; Barres longitudinales intégrées; Gouttières; Barres longitudinales surélevées; Fixation sur rails/rainures; Autre
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ dažďového žliabku strechy: Holá strecha (upínanie na rám dverí); Lišty na korbu (pickup); Továrenské priečniky; Upevnenie do pevných bodov; Integrované pozdĺžniky; Dažďové žľaby; Zvýšené pozdĺžniky; Upevnenie do koľajničiek/drážok; Iné
th: ประเภทรางหลังคาที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: หลังคาเรียบ (หนีบกับขอบประตู); ราวกระบะ (รถกระบะ); คานขวางจากโรงงาน; จุดยึดแบบตายตัว; ราวหลังคาแบบแนบ; รางน้ำฝน; ราวหลังคาแบบลอย; จุดยึดแบบราง/ช่อง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tip de șină de plafon compatibilă: Plafon simplu (prindere pe tocul ușii); Șine pentru benă (pickup); Bare transversale din fabrică; Montare în puncte fixe; Șine laterale integrate; Jgheaburi; Șine laterale înălțate; Montare pe șină/canal; Altele
tr: Uyumlu tavan rayı tipi: Çıplak tavan (kapı çerçevesine klipsli); Kasa rayları (kamyonet); Fabrika çıkışı ara atkılar; Sabit nokta montajı; Gömme yan raylar; Yağmur olukları; Yükseltilmiş yan raylar; Ray/kanal montajı; Diğer
fi: Yhteensopiva kattokiskotyyppi: Paljas katto (kiinnitys ovenkarmiin); Lavan kiskot (lava-auto); Tehdasasennetut poikittaiskiskot; Kiinteä kiinnityspiste; Integroidut kattokaiteet; Sadevesikourut; Korotetut kattokaiteet; Kisko-/ura-asennus; Muu
en: Compatible roof rail type: Bare roof (clip-on door frame); Bed rails (pickup); Factory crossbars; Fixed point mount; Flush side rails; Rain gutters; Raised side rails; Track/Channel mount; Other
ko: 호환 루프레일 유형: 베어 루프(클립형 도어 프레임); 베드 레일(픽업); 순정 크로스바; 픽스 포인트 마운트; 플러시 사이드 레일; 레인 거터; 레이즈드 사이드 레일; 트랙/채널 마운트; 기타
zh-TW: 相容車頂架類型: 平車頂 (夾扣式門框); 車斗導軌 (皮卡車); 原廠橫桿; 固定點安裝; 平齊式側導軌; 雨水槽; 加高式側導軌; 軌道/溝槽安裝; 其他
lt-LT: Suderinamo tipo stogo bėgelis: Tuščias stogas (tvirtinama prie durų rėmo); Kėbulo bėgeliai (pikapo); Gamykliniai skersiniai; Fiksuotų taškų tvirtinimas; Prigludę išilginiai stogo bėgeliai; Lietaus latakai; Iškelti išilginiai stogo bėgeliai; Bėgelių / kanalų tvirtinimas; Kita
ja: 対応ルーフレールタイプ: ベアルーフ (ドアフレームクリップオン); ベッドレール (ピックアップ); 純正クロスバー; フィックスポイントマウント; フラッシュサイドレール; レインガーター; レイズドサイドレール; トラック/チャンネルマウント; その他
it: Tipo di barra portatutto compatibile: Tetto nudo (aggancio sul telaio della portiera); Barre per cassone (pickup); Barre trasversali di serie; Montaggio a punti fissi; Barre longitudinali integrate; Canaline di scolo; Barre longitudinali rialzate; Montaggio su binario/canalina; Altro
vi: Loại thanh ray mái tương thích: Trần xe trơn (kẹp khung cửa); Thanh thùng xe (bán tải); Thanh giá nóc ngang nguyên bản; Ngàm điểm cố định; Thanh giá nóc dọc chìm; Máng nước; Thanh giá nóc dọc nổi; Ngàm rãnh trượt; Khác
zh-CN: 适配车顶行李架类型: 光板车顶（卡扣式门框）; 货箱导轨（皮卡）; 原厂横杆; 固定点安装; 齐平式侧导轨; 雨水槽; 凸起式侧导轨; 滑轨/槽道安装; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместим тип покривни релси: Покрив без рейки (монтаж на рамката на вратата); Рейки за каросерия (пикап); Фабрични напречни греди; Монтаж на фиксирани точки; Интегрирани надлъжни греди; Водобрани; Повдигнати надлъжни греди; Монтаж на шина/канал; Друг
el: Συμβατός τύπος ράγας οροφής: Γυμνή οροφή (με κλιπ στο πλαίσιο της πόρτας); Ράγες καρότσας (pickup); Εργοστασιακές εγκάρσιες μπάρες; Βάση σταθερού σημείου; Χωνευτές πλευρικές ράγες; Υδρορροές οροφής; Υπερυψωμένες πλευρικές ράγες; Βάση σε ράγα/κανάλι; Άλλο
pl: Kompatybilny typ relingu dachowego: Gładki dach (zaczepy na ramie drzwi); Relingi paki (pickup); Fabryczne belki poprzeczne; Punkty montażowe; Relingi zintegrowane; Rynienki dachowe; Relingi podwyższone; Montaż w szynach; Inne
ru: Совместимый тип рейлингов: Гладкая крыша (крепление за дверной проем); Рейлинги на кузов (пикап); Заводские поперечины; Крепление в штатные места; Интегрированные рейлинги; Водостоки; Просветные рейлинги; Крепление на Т-образный профиль; Другое
hr-HR: Kompatibilna vrsta šine za krov: Goli krov (pričvršćivanje na okvir vrata); Vodilice sanduka (pickup); Tvorničke poprečne šipke; Montaža u fiksne točke; Integrirane uzdužne vodilice; Kišni žljebovi; Uzdignute uzdužne vodilice; Montaža na vodilicu/kanal; Ostalo
es: Tipo de riel de techo compatible: Techo expuesto (con enganche en marco de la puerta); Rieles de caja (camioneta); Barras transversales de fábrica; Montaje de punto fijo; Rieles laterales al ras; Canaletas para lluvia; Rieles laterales elevados; Montaje en riel/canal; Otro
de: Kompatibler Dachrelingtyp: Glattes Dach (Klemmung am Türrahmen); Ladeflächenschienen (Pickup); Werksseitige Querträger; Fixpunktbefestigung; Integrierte Dachreling; Regenrinnen; Offene Dachreling; Schienen-/Kanalbefestigung; Sonstige
da: Kompatibel tagrælingstype: Nøgent tag (klemmes på dørkarmen); Ladsider (pickup); Fabriksmonterede tværstænger; Montering i faste punkter; Integrerede tagrælinger; Tagrender; Forhøjede tagrælinger; Montering i skinne/kanal; Andet
nl: Compatibel type dakrail: Kaal dak (klembevestiging portier); Laadbakrails (pick-up); Fabrieksdwarsdragers; Vaste bevestigingspunten; Geïntegreerde dakrails; Regengoten; Open dakrails; Rail-/sleufbevestiging; Overige
sv: Kompatibel takrännetyp: Tak utan reling (kläms fast i dörrkarmen); Flakräcke (pickup); Fabriksmonterade tvärstag; Fasta fästpunkter; Integrerad takreling; Dropplister; Upphöjd takreling; Spår-/kanalfäste; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de longarina de teto compatível: Teto liso (encaixe na porta); Trilhos de caçamba (picape); Travessas de fábrica; Fixação em ponto fixo; Longarinas embutidas; Calhas de chuva; Longarinas elevadas; Fixação em trilho/canal; Outro